Vermont statutes. Title 24 Municipal and County Government
Subchapter 2. Public Funds

§ 2431.
Trustees of public funds.

Real and personal estate, except U.S. public money, held by a town in trust for any purpose, including cemetery trust funds, unless the person giving the same otherwise directs, shall be under the charge and management of three trustees, elected by the town when the town so votes.
At the meeting when such trustees are first elected, they shall be elected for the following terms: one for one year, one for two years, and one for three years.
Their successors shall be elected for the term of three years, but a person chosen to fill a vacancy caused by death, resignation, or otherwise shall serve only for the remainder of the unexpired term.

§ 2432.
Powers and duties; investments.

The trustees shall apply estate income to the purpose for which it is held, and deeds or contracts made by them shall be in the name of the town.
(a) (1) The trustees shall apply estate income to the purpose for which it is held, and deeds or contracts made by them shall be in the name of the town.

The trustees may:

lease, sell, or convey real estate so held and invest the funds received therefrom; and

lend estate money at annual or semiannual interest, and as security for each loan shall take deeds or mortgages of real estate in this State.

The trustees may invest in:

any security, including a revenue obligation, issued, insured, or guaranteed by the United States;

municipal bonds or other bonds that are rated at the time of the transaction by a nationally recognized statistical rating organization, as defined in

15 U.S.C. § 78c

(a)(62) as may be amended, in one of its four highest categories;

repurchase agreements or debt securities of any federally insured financial institution as defined in

8 V.S.A. § 11101(32)

;

the shares of an investment company, or an investment trust, such as a mutual fund, closed-end fund, or unit investment trust, that is registered under the federal Investment Company Act of 1940, as amended, if the mutual investment fund has been in operation for at least five years and has net assets of at least $100,000,000.00; or

deposits in federally insured financial institutions as defined in

8 V.S.A. § 11101(32)

.

The trustees shall have full power to hold, purchase, sell, assign, transfer, and dispose of any of the securities and investments in which any of the funds have been invested, as well as the proceeds of the investments.
(c) (1) The trustees shall have full power to hold, purchase, sell, assign, transfer, and dispose of any of the securities and investments in which any of the funds have been invested, as well as the proceeds of the investments.

The trustees are encouraged to invest in financial institutions operating in the State and in investments within the State that will result in reinvestment in Vermont.

The provisions of this section as to future investments shall not require the liquidation or disposition of securities legally acquired and held.

If the municipality has adopted an investment policy, the trustees shall invest in accordance with the provisions of the municipal policy that do not conflict with this section.

The trustees may delegate management and investment of funds under their charge to the extent that is prudent under the terms of the trust or endowment, and in accordance with section 3415 (delegation of management and investment functions) of the Uniform Prudent Management of Institutional Funds Act, 14 V.S.A. chapter 120. Notwithstanding the limitations on investments set forth in subsection (b) of this section, an agent exercising a delegated management or investment function, if investing, shall invest the funds in a publicly traded security that is:

registered with the Securities and Exchange Commission pursuant to

15 U.S.C. § 78l

and listed on a national securities exchange;

issued by an investment company registered pursuant to

15 U.S.C. § 80a

-8;

a corporate bond registered as an offering with the Securities and Exchange Commission pursuant to

15 U.S.C. § 78l

and issued by an entity whose stock is a publicly traded security;

a municipal security;

a deposit in federally insured financial institutions as defined in

8 V.S.A. § 11101(32)

; or

a security issued, insured, or guaranteed by the United States.

HISTORY:

Amended

2003, No. 150

(Adj. Sess.), § 8;

2017, No. 123

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. May 3, 2018.

§ 2433.
Bonds; actions.

The trustees shall give bonds to the satisfaction of the selectboard, conditioned for the faithful performance of their duties.
In the name of the town they may prosecute and defend a suit or action for the recovery or protection of the estate entrusted to their care.

§ 2434.
Report.

The trustees shall report to the annual town meeting the amount of the funds in their hands, the manner and condition of its investment, and the disposal of the income thereof.
If any part of such fund is school money, such trustees shall make like report to the State Board of Education.